Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-2279
Senior volunteers; benefits.

(1) A senior volunteer may receive (a) transportation expenses for transportation to and from their residences and the place where services are to be rendered, (b) one free meal when reasonably available during each day that services are rendered, and (c) an annual physical examination.

(2) A senior volunteer shall receive motor vehicle accident and liability insurance coverage.

Laws 2000, LB 1101, § 8;

Laws 2017, LB417, § 21.